Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5523.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-46 of the General Laws entitled "Open Meetings" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-46-15. Translation and interpretation services.
(a) All public bodies shall develop a translation assistance plan setting forth the steps
necessary to ensure that all open meetings of said bodies shall have the proceedings accessible to
an individual in a language they understand, upon request, including American Sign Language
(ASL).
(b) The public body shall implement the translation assistance plan under this section by
September 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001065
========